Utah statutes.
31A-23a-807.    Duties of reinsurers utilizing the services of reinsurance.
(1)  A reinsurer may not engage the services of any person, firm, association,
or corporation to act as a reinsurance intermediary-manager on its behalf
unless the person is licensed as required by Subsection 31A-23a-801(2).
(2)  The reinsurer shall annually obtain a copy of statements of the financial
condition of each reinsurance intermediary-manager which the reinsurer has
engaged, which shall be prepared by an independent certified public accountant
in a form acceptable to the commissioner.
(3)  If a reinsurance intermediary-manager establishes loss reserves, the
reinsurer shall annually obtain the opinion of an actuary attesting to the
adequacy of loss reserves established for losses incurred and outstanding on
business produced by the reinsurance intermediary-manager. The actuary's
opinion shall be in addition to any other required loss reserve certification.
(4)  Binding authority for all retrocessional contracts or participation in
reinsurance syndicates shall rest with an officer of the reinsurer, who may
not be affiliated with the reinsurance intermediary-manager.
(5)  Within 30 days of termination of a contract with a reinsurance
intermediary-manager, the reinsurer shall provide written notification of the
termination to the commissioner.
(6)  A reinsurer may not appoint to its board of directors, any officer,
director, employee, controlling shareholder, or subproducer of its reinsurance
intermediary-manager.  This subsection does not apply to relationships
governed by Title 31A, Chapter 16, Insurance Holding Companies, or Chapter
23a, Part 7, Producer Controlled Insurers, if it applies.
